Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-271 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Insulin Access and Affordability
Program, which shall be administered by the State Department of
Health for the purpose of increasing patient access to affordable
insulin in this state, reducing prescription drug costs for
consumers and payors, bolstering American manufacturing of
pharmaceuticals, increasing marketplace competition, and addressing
shortages in the market for generic insulin.
B. The Department shall, with funds appropriated by the
Legislature, provide financial support to one or more pharmaceutical
manufacturers that manufacture, or are currently developing, a fast-

acting biosimilar insulin. Each such pharmaceutical manufacturer
shall manufacture the fast-acting biosimilar insulin in the United
States.
C. Prior to disbursement of any funds, the Department shall
enter into a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with the
pharmaceutical manufacturer or manufacturers, and each manufacturer
shall demonstrate a match of non-state funds equal to the amount
received by the manufacturer under the Insulin Access and
Affordability Program. The MOU shall include, but not be limited
to:
1. A commitment by the manufacturer to produce a fast-acting
biosimilar insulin at a low net cost without rebates, except as
required by law, within a time frame agreed upon between the
Department and the manufacturer;
2. A commitment by the manufacturer to manufacture fast-acting
biosimilar insulin in the United States;
3. Estimated savings from the purchase of low-cost, fast-acting
biosimilar insulin including, but not limited to, the estimated
savings to residents of this state and public and private payors
from the availability of low-cost, fast-acting biosimilar insulin;
and
4. Provisions for the repayment of the funds provided under the
Insulin Access and Affordability Program if the manufacturer fails
to produce and distribute a low-cost, fast-acting biosimilar insulin
or otherwise fails to substantially comply with the requirements of
this section or the MOU.
D. The pharmaceutical manufacturer or manufacturers shall
submit reports annually to the Department on the development,
production, and distribution, as applicable, of the fast-acting
biosimilar insulin in a manner prescribed by the Department. The
Department shall compile the reports into a single report and shall
annually submit such report electronically to the Governor, the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1344 Page 2

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1344 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 24th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1344 Page 4